Washington statutes.
RCW 15.53.9044

Disposition of moneys.

All moneys collected under this chapter shall be paid to the director and deposited in an account within the agricultural local fund. Such deposits shall be used only in the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

[ 2005 c 18 s 9; 1988 c 254 s 5; 1975 1st ex.s. c 257 s 8; 1965 ex.s. c 31 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 257: See note following RCW 15.13.470.